Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2520
Applicability of Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act.

A joint public agency may be sued subject to the Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 20.

Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act, see section 13-901.